South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S778.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-6-75. (A) Any facility licensed by the Department of Public Health to operate as an abortion provider pursuant to Section 44-41-75 and any affiliated physicians or professional medical practices who are operating concurrently with and in the same physical, geographic location or footprint as the licensed facility are unqualified to provide family planning services under the State's Medicaid program. (B) State and local funds for family planning, whether through a grant, a contract, state-administered federal funds, or any other form, may not be directly or indirectly provided to any facility licensed by the Department of Public Health to operate as abortion provider pursuant to Section 44-41-75 or to a physician or professional medical practice affiliated with a licensed abortion provider who is operating concurrently with and in the same physical, geographic location or footprint as the licensed facility. (C) The department of Public Health shall prepare, produce, and make publicly available in a user-friendly format a list of all qualified family planning service providers operating within a twenty-five-mile radius of any facility licensed to provide abortions pursuant to Section 44-41-75 that is excluded from the State's Medicaid provider network. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----